Arkansas, session 2025, SB260.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 5-4-204 is amended to read as follows:
§ 5-4-204. Collection after default.
(a) When a defendant sentenced to pay a fine or costs fines, fees, or
costs defaults in the payment of the fine or costs fines, fees, or costs or
of any installment, the fine or costs fines, fees, or costs may be collected
by:
(1) By any means authorized for the enforcement of a money
judgment in a civil action; or
(2) Upon the court's own motion, by the interception of the
defendant's state income tax return by following the procedures under § 5-4-
206(d)—(f) for the collection of unpaid restitution.
(b) A judgment that the defendant pay a fine or costs fines, fees, or
costs constitutes a lien on the real property and personal property of the
defendant in the same manner and to the same extent as a money judgment in a
civil action.

*CEB129*
02/19/2025 3:25:50 PM CEB129